Texas, session 891, HB306.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  DEFINITIONS. In this Act: (1)  "Authority" means the Upper Guadalupe River Authority. (2)  "Board" means the Texas Water Development Board. (3)  "Regional flood plan" means the regional flood plan developed under Section 16.062, Water Code, for the flood planning region that includes the upper Guadalupe River basin. (4)  "Regional flood planning group" means the regional flood planning group designated under Section 16.062, Water Code, whose flood planning region includes the upper Guadalupe River basin. SECTION 2.  STUDY AND REPORT. (a) The authority, in consultation with the board, the Texas Department of Transportation, and the regional flood planning group, shall conduct a risk assessment and project feasibility study to: (1)  quantify the risk to life and property posed by flooding in the upper Guadalupe River basin; (2)  assess potential solutions to mitigate flood risks identified under Subdivision (1) of this subsection; and (3)  propose not more than eight projects that will help mitigate the flood risks identified under Subdivision (1) of this subsection. (b)  In quantifying the risk to life and property under Subsection (a)(1) of this section, the authority shall: (1)  collect and assess existing data, including the data collected in connection with the regional flood plan, any integrated flood risk management studies for the area, topographic data, existing locally developed models, structure inventories, and hydrologic analyses; (2)  update as appropriate the information collected under Subdivision (1) of this subsection by incorporating the July 4, 2025, weather event; and (3)  develop hydraulic models for the major creeks and rivers within the upper Guadalupe River basin. (c)  In assessing potential solutions to mitigate flood risks under Subsection (a)(2) of this section, the authority shall: (1)  identify projects that reduce susceptibility to flooding, including off-river detention storage, on-river dams, improved evacuation routes, river channel modification, and improved or new storm drainage systems; (2)  develop a hydraulic model for each potential project to determine the effect of the project with respect to: (A)  flood mitigation; (B)  water supply; (C)  groundwater recharge; (D)  recreation; and (E)  environmental impacts; and (3)  conduct community meetings to gather input and feedback from residents with respect to the projects. (d)  In proposing projects that may help mitigate the flood risks under Subsection (a)(3) of this section, the authority shall: (1)  determine the costs and benefits of each project; (2)  score and rank the projects based on community feedback and the costs and benefits of the projects; and (3)  to the extent possible, develop design documents for the highest-ranked projects to expedite the completion of those projects. (e)  Not later than January 1, 2027, the authority shall present to the board and the legislature a report that contains a summary of the study conducted under this Act and a description of the projects identified by the authority that would best mitigate flooding in the upper Guadalupe River basin. SECTION 3.  EXPIRATION. This Act expires January 1, 2028. SECTION 4.  EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.